Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-912
Director, employee; no gift or gratuity; violation; removal from office.

Neither the Director of Correctional Services nor any employee of the Department of Correctional Services shall receive from any person, firm, or corporation having dealings with the department, or from any employee or representative of such person, firm, or corporation, any gift or gratuity, either directly or indirectly, for himself or for any other person. The director or any employee who receives such a gift or gratuity shall be deemed guilty of bribery under section 28-917 and shall be removed from office.

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 64;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 48.